dictsource/hu_rules
// Hungarian translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

//  ?1  change pronmunciation of foreign names, some users don't want these rules

.replace
//  allow o,u-circumflex for o,u-double-acute
ô	ő
û	ű

// these consonants following a double letter change it to single
.L01  b c d f g h j k l m n p s t r v w z

.group a
        a          A
     _) a (_       %A
 D00_-) al (_      zAl       // double z for 100-al
 000_-) al (_      Al        // ... but not 1000-al
        ahhoz      Ahoz


.group á
        á          a:
     @) ában (_S4q a:bAn
     @) ának (_S4q a:nAk
     @) ától (_S4q a:to:l
     @) áig (_S3q  a:ig
     @) ára (_S3q  a:R2A

.group b
        b          b
        bb         b:
     @) ban (_S3q  bAn
     @) ben (_S3   bEn

        biz (A     biz,      // bizalmas  etc.
?1      biedermeier bi:dER2ma:jER2
     _) batthiány  bAc:a:n^i
        b (-b      b:        // use long [b:], not two [b]
    b-) b                    // silent after 'bb-'
        bb (-b     b:
   bb-) b                    //silent after bb- part
        bb (-L01   b         // only speak one b if followed by a consonant after the - character

        bb (L01    b         // only speak one b if followed by a consonant
        bbr        bR2       //special exception with always need executing
        bbj        bj        //special exception with always need executing

.group c
        c          ts
        cc         ts:
        cs         tS
        ccs        tS:
     !) cz         ts        // in names which start with a capital letter

kalapá) csz (en    tSz
        csz        ts|s
  papu) cs         tS
    ar) c (cson    ts
  mala) c (sá      ts
    pá) c (só      ts
   pol) c (so      ts
   por) c (sé      ts
   por) c (sz      ts
?1 _sto) ck (holm   k
   har) c (csoport ts
   lán) c (cs      ts
 kudar) c (sorozat ts
 gerin) c          ts
   tán) c (cs      ts
   tán) c (s       ts
 kilen) c (csatorn ts
   ner) c (stóla   ts
  kavi) cs (zátony tS
   har) c (cselek  ts
 külön) c (sé      ts
  mala) c (sül     ts
gyümöl) cs (zs     tS
   fil) c (csiz    ts
   szo) c (segély  ts
   _kó) c (csomó   ts
  árbó) c (csúcs   ts
  árbo) c (csúcs   ts
fegyen) c (csoport ts
        ccs (L01   tS        // only speak one cs if followed by a consonant
        cc (L01    ts        // only speak one c if followed by a consonant
        ccsr       tSR2      //special exception with need always execute
        ccr        tsR2      //special exception
        c (-cs     tstS      //if have end of first word c and after the - character a cs letter pair, need spokening single ts and TS phoneme
    c-) cs                   //not need spokening second cs phoneme
        cs (-ccs   tS:       //this situation need spokening one TS: phoneme
   cs-) ccs                  //not need spokening second tS: phoneme after - character
        c (-c      ts:       // use long [ts:], not two [ts]
    c-) c                    // silent after 'cc-'
        ccs (-ccs  tS:
  ccs-) ccs 
        ccs (-cs   tS:       //need spokening one longer TS: phoneme
  ccs-) cs                   //not need spokening second tS phoneme
        cc (-cs    ts        //if this situation happening, need spokening one ts phoneme
   cc-) cs         tS        //need spokening the TS phoneme after the - character
        cc (-ccs   ts        //need spokening one ts phoneme before the - character
   cc-) ccs        tS        //need spokening shorter tS phoneme after the - character
        cc (-c     ts:       // use long [ts:], not two [ts] if after the - character have only cc letter pair
   cc-) c                    //second ts phoneme not need spokening after the - character
        cc (-L01   ts        // only speak one c if followed by a consonant after the - character
        cs (-cs    tS:       // use long [tS:], not two [tS]
   cs-) cs                   // second tS phoneme not need spokening after - character
        ccs (-L01  tS        // only speak one ts if followed by a consonant after the - character
        cs (-sz    tS|s      //need spokening single ts and single s phoneme
        ccs (-sz   tS|s      //need spokening single ts and single s phoneme
 licen) c (sértés  ts
  _fil) c (csík    ts
  _pia) c (csarnok ts
  _pol) c (csat    ts
 _mala) c (sivít   ts
_kilen) c (csöv    ts
_kilen) c (csomó   ts
szanité) c (cs     ts
 pokró) c (cs      ts
   kul) cs (zörg   tS
 kartá) cs (zápo   tS
 ínyen) c (ség     ts
  bohó) c (sapk    ts
  bohó) c (sipk    ts
 kilen) c (sáv     ts
        cszs       tSZ
 kilen) c (schill  ts
 _bohó) cs         ts|S

.group ch
  anar) ch (i      h
 balda) ch (in     h
hierar) ch (i      h
    me) ch (a      h
    te) ch         h
  pszi) ch         h
  pszy) ch         h
   mün) ch (en     C
  maso) ch (istA   h
 monar) ch (i      h
   _pe) ch         h:
   szé) ch         tS
   _zi) ch (y      tS
  _szé) che (ny    tSe:
  _szé) ché (ny    tSe:
    ja) ch (t      h
    ce) ch (et     h:
    or) ch (ídea   h
  stri) ch (el     h:
    ar) ch (ív     h
    ar) ch (ivál   h
    ar) ch (itektú h
    ma) ch (iná    h
oligar) ch         h
 legpe) ch (es     h:
  mazo) ch (izm    h
  mazo) ch (is     h
    ar) ch (aikus  h


.group d
        d          d
        dd         d:
        dts        tS:
        dt         t:
        dtszé      t:se:
        ddzs (L01  dZ
        ddz (L01   dz
        dd (L01    d
        ddb        db        //general exception with alwais need executing
        ddr        dR2       //special exception with always need executing
        d (-d      d:        //if have d after the - character, need spokening longer d: phoneme, not two single d phoneme
    d-) d                    //but the second d phoneme after the - character not need spokening
        ddzs (-L01 dZ        //need spokening one dZ phoneme if have after the - character a consonant
        dd (-d     d:        //if have two d the first word and a d with second word beginning, need spokening a longer d: phoneme, not a longer d: and a single d phoneme
   dd-) d                    //the second d phoneme not need pronouncing
        dd (-L01   d         //if have a consonant after the - character, need spokening one d letter, not often happening this but not matter if handled
  apró) d (sz      d
        dsz (_S3   ts:
 beszé) d (szin    d
 beszé) d (sebesség d
 cselé) d          d
        dobermann  dob:ER2mAn
   föl) d (sánc    d
    ha) dd (_S2    d
    ha) d (járat   d
    ha) d (sor     d
   hor) d (szék    d
  máso) d (sor     d

    pa) d (sor     d
   ren) d (sza     d

    va) d (sző     d
     C) ds         tS
        ds (C      tS
     A) ds (A      tS:
        dsz        ts
        dsz (C     ts
        dsz (a     ds
        dsz (á     ds
     a) dsz (A     ts:
     e) dsz (A     ts:
     o) dsz (A     ts:
     a) dsz (í     ds
     é) dsz        ds
     ó) dsz        ts:
     C) dj         J
     A) dj (A      J:
        dj         J:
   min) dny        n^
    ná) d          d
    ná) dd         d:
?1      diesel     di:zEl
    hí) d (szerkezet d
        dühvel     dyvEl
 epizó) d (szerep  d
 negye) d (száz    d
        dühbe      dybE
 fülle) dtt (é     t:
   föl) d (sáv     d
        dühtől     dytY:l
  rövi) d (zárlat  d
   ren) dsz (erint d|s
 szaba) d (szájú   d
menetren) dsz (erű d|s
 hazár) d (játék   d
  főha) d (segéd   d
 csalá) d (szerető d
   föl) d (szoros  d
   min) d (jobban  d
   bri) ddzs (el   dZ:
 rekor) d (sebesség 
   hol) d (sü      d
  árpá) d (sáv     d
   ötö) dsz (ör    ts:
  ezre) d (szin    d
    ha) d (szin    d
   hor) d (szí     d
  ezre) d (szá     d
    kó) d (sor     d
  máso) d (szin    d
    ha) d (segéd   d
   föl) d (szerzé  d
  twee) dz (ak     d|z
  twee) dsz (ok    d|s
        dtt        t:        //this letters need spokening longer t phoneme
   kar) d (su      d
   zöl) d (sapk    d
    hí) d (szer    d
 szaba) d (szoft   d
  rövi) d (zár     d
   ren) d (zavar   d
 ügyvé) d (jel     d
   kez) dt         t
    ná) d (szék    d
  rövi) d (soroz   d
    pa) d (szerű   d
    ná) d (suhog   d
  kató) d (sugár   d
 kalan) d (játék   d
  ezre) d (szem    d
    vé) d (jegy    d
 honvé) d (sereg   d
    va) d (szeder  d
  twee) d (sapk    d
  ezre) d (segé    d
   erő) d (szerű   d
 csalá) d (szociol d
 száza) d (szemle  d
   zöl) d (szem    d
   utó) d (jelöl   d
 cselé) ds (ég     tS:
   föl) d (szegély d
 stran) d (szezon  d
  _hol) d (sarló   d
    mó) d (sor     d
 csalá) d (segít   d
standar) d (jegy   d
  csen) d (sértés  d
 szaba) d (strand  d
   zöl) d (sáv     d
 csalá) d (jog     d
 szaba) d (szállás d
 szaba) d (szombat d
   ren) dsz (erintegráció ts
  máso) d (szülött d
    va) d (szój    d
   ebé) d (jeg     d
 szaba) d (jeg     d         //szabadjegy, szabadjeggyel words need spokening single d phoneme
  tize) d (száz    d         //for example tizedszázalék word need single d and s phoneme
   föl) d (szerű   d         //this word need spokening single d before s phoneme
    va) d (sztrájk d         //this word need spokening single d before s phoneme
   kar) d (szerű   d         //this word need spokening single d before s phoneme
    kö) d (szirén  d         //this word need spokening single d before s phoneme
 rekor) d (szerkez d         //this word need spokening single d before s phoneme
    kö) d (szitálás d
    mó) d (javaslat d
 rekor) d (szint   d
 kambo) dzs        dZ:
   föl) d (szerke  d         //földszerkezet word for example need spokening single d before sz letter
 harma) d (szint   d
    kó) d (jel     d
 harma) d (sor     d
 beszé) d (javít   d
 rekor) d (sugár   d
  máso) d (szaká   d         //For example másodszakács, másodszakáccsá words need spokening single d phoneme before s phoneme
   _ná) d (söv     d         //for example nádsövénnyé word
        dt (sz     t:
miliár) d (szor    d

.group dz
  fogó) dz (kod    ts
  fogó) dz (ó      z
fenyegető) dz      z
 akaró) dz         z
hallgató) dz       z
  húzó) dz         ts
harapó) dz         z
himbáló) dz        z
  lopó) dz         z
szedelő) dz        z
tapogató) dz       z
     ó) dz (kod    ts
 villó) dz         z
     e) dz (ő      dz:
     e) dz (és     dz:
  kére) dz         ts
mentegető) dz      z
        dz         dz:
     A) dz (A      dz:
        dzs        dZ
        dzs (C     dZ
     a) dzs (A     dZ
  mene) dzs (A     dZ:
mahara) dzs (A     dZ:
   bri) dzs (A     dZ:
?1 kambo) dzs (A     dZ:       //a town name with need spokening dZ: phoneme
   _do) dzs (A     dZ:       //for example dodzsemautó need spokening dZ: phoneme
        dz         dz:
     C) dzs        dZ
 borsó) dz         z
 beszé) dz (avar   d|z
dobáló) dz         z
  kérő) dz         z
követelő) dz       z
rángató) dz        z
titkoló) dz        z
ringató) dz        z
  mére) dz (k      ts
  ezre) dz (ene    d|z
 száza) dz (ene    d|z
 honvé) dz (ászló  d|z
smarag) dz (öld    d|z
kapáló) dz         z
    _ó) dz (ko     ts
 gyűrű) dz (ik     z
burkoló) dz        z

.group e
        e          E
 000_-) el (_      REl       // double R for 1000-el
000000_-) el (_    El        // ... but not 1000000-el
     _) ehhez      EhEz
     _) egyezség   EJ:ESSe:g
     _) egyezségg  EJ:ESSe:g:

.group é
        é          e:
        éi (é      e::i:
     @) ében (_S4q e:bEn
     @) ének (_S4q e:nEk
     @) étől (_S4q e:tY:l
     @) ére (_S3q  e:R2E
     @) éig (_S3q  e:ig
        éhség      e:Se:g
        éhségg     e:Se:g:

.group ë
        ë          Y

.group f
        f          f
?1      führer     fy:R2ER2
     e) ff (ajt    f
     e) ff (él     f
     a) ff (él     f
        ff (L01    f         // only speak one b if followed by a consonant
        ffb        fb        //general rule, always need one f before the remaining b beginning word, for example be end of words
        ffr        fR2       //general rule, always need one f before the remaining b beginning word, for example be end of words
        ff (-L01   f
